Massachusetts, session 194th, H5427.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION I. Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, James Hicks, 
Police Chief of the Town of Natick, may continue to serve in that position until reaching age 67, 
the date of his retirement, or the date he is relieved of his duties by the Select Board at their 
discretion, whichever occurs first; provided, however, that he is mentally and physically capable 
of performing the duties of Police Chief. The Select Board may, at the Town's own expense, 
require that James Hicks be examined annually by a physician designated by the Select Board, to 
determine such physical and mental capability to perform the duties of his office. 
No further deductions shall be made from the regular compensation of James Hicks, 
pursuant to chapter 32 of the General Laws for service subsequent to his reaching age 65; and 
upon retirement for superannuation, he shall receive a superannuation retirement allowance equal 
to the allowance that he would have been entitled had he retired upon reaching age 65.